incubator/apertium-ina/apertium-ina.ina.dix
   <pardef n="vblex-common">  <!-- common to all vblex paradigms -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rea</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vblex-pp-common">   <!-- what's common to past participles -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vblex-pprs-common"> <!-- what's common to present participles -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nte</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>






    <pardef n="canta/r__vblex">
      <e><par n="vblex-common"/></e>
      <e><par n="vblex-pp-common"/></e>
      <e><par n="vblex-pprs-common"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="parti/r__vblex">
      <e><par n="vblex-common"/></e>
      <e><par n="vblex-pp-common"/></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r/></p><par n="vblex-pprs-common"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cred/er__vblex">
      <e><i>e</i><par n="vblex-common"/></e>  
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e</r></p><par n="vblex-pp-common"/></e> <!-- cred-ite -->
      <e><i>e</i><par n="vblex-pprs-common"/></e> <!-- cred-ente -->
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="pot/er__vbmod">  <!-- hard to collapse with vblex paradigms -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>er<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eva</l>
          <r>r<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>er<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erea</l>
          <r>er<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ente</l>
          <r>er<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>er<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="ha/ber__vblex">  <!-- hard to collapse with vblex paradigms -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ber</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>beva</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bera</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>berea</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bente</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bite</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha/ber__vbhaver">  <!-- hard to collapse with vblex paradigms -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ber</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>beva</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bera</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>berea</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bente</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bite</l>
          <r>ber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/esser__vblex"> <!-- this should probably not be vblex; if it is, it could be factored -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esser</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sia</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sia</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esse</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>son</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>so</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>somos</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esseva</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essera</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sera</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esserea</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>serea</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essente</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essete</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="esser"><i></i><par n="/esser__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="morir"><i>mori</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dormir"><i>dormi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="haber"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ber__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="haber"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ber__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poter"><i>pot</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="mitter"><i>mitt</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deber"><i>deb</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="continuar"><i>continua</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="remitter"><i>remitt</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reciper"><i>recip</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="venir"><i>veni</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tener"><i>ten</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="timer"><i>tim</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="remaner"><i>reman</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="peter"><i>pet</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jacer"><i>jac</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="clauder"><i>claud</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="viagiar"><i>viagia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pagar"><i>paga</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cessar"><i>cessa</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sentir"><i>senti</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impedir"><i>impedi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="evenir"><i>eveni</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="convenir"><i>conveni</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abolir"><i>aboli</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="adjunger"><i>adjung</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="consentir"><i>consenti</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="augmentar"><i>augmenta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bullir"><i>bulli</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abstruder"><i>abstrud</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contradicer"><i>contradic</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="secar"><i>seca</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dissolver"><i>dissolv</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="linir"><i>lini</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inseniar"><i>insenia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fornir"><i>forni</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grattar"><i>gratta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vestir"><i>vesti</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="docer"><i>doc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="magrir"><i>magri</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mesurar"><i>mesura</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nocer"><i>noc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aperir"><i>aperi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pesar"><i>pesa</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pluver"><i>pluv</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vomir"><i>vomi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="notar"><i>nota</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="restringer"><i>restring</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sufflar"><i>suffla</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="patir"><i>pati</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="morir"><i>mori</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="suger"><i>sug</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trair"><i>trai</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="valer"><i>val</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abordar"><i>aborda</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alinear"><i>alinea</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="magrir"><i>magri</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="impovrir"><i>impovri</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arguer"><i>argu</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brandir"><i>brandi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="expectar"><i>expecta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="compromitter"><i>compromitt</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diagnosticar"><i>diagnostica</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distinguer"><i>distingu</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inrichir"><i>inrichi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="evincer"><i>evinc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="garantir"><i>garanti</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vomir"><i>vomi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="governar"><i>governa</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mascar"><i>masca</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dispender"><i>dispend</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cogitar"><i>cogita</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reunir"><i>reuni</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amalgamar"><i>amalgama</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beneficiar"><i>beneficia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="circular"><i>circula</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="desertar"><i>deserta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fructar"><i>fructa</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="meditar"><i>medita</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="refrenar"><i>refrena</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ultrapassar"><i>ultrapassa</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="adjunger"><i>adjung</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diminuer"><i>diminu</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="adjutar"><i>adjuta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="amortir"><i>amorti</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="revider"><i>revid</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rolar"><i>rola</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prender"><i>prend</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="polir"><i>poli</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="colliger"><i>collig</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
